Utah statutes.
11-42-201.   Resolution or ordinance designating an assessment area -- Zones
within an assessment area -- Preconditions to adoption of a resolution or
ordinance.
(1) (a)  Subject to the requirements of this part, a governing body of a local
entity intending to levy an assessment on property to pay some or all of the
cost of providing improvements benefitting the property, performing operation
and maintenance benefitting the property, or conducting economic promotion
activities benefitting the property shall adopt a resolution or ordinance
designating an assessment area.
(b)  A designation resolution or designation ordinance described in Subsection
(1)(a) may divide the assessment area into zones to allow the governing body
to:
(i)  levy a different level of assessment; or
(ii)  use a different assessment method in each zone to reflect more fairly
the benefits that property within the different zones is expected to receive
because of the proposed improvement, operation and maintenance, or economic
promotion activities.
(c)  The boundaries of a proposed assessment area may include property that is
not intended to be assessed.
(2)  Before adopting a designation resolution or designation ordinance
described in Subsection (1)(a), the governing body of the local entity shall:
(a)  give notice as provided in Section 11-42-202;
(b)  receive and consider all protests filed under Section 11-42-203; and
(c)  hold a public hearing as provided in Section 11-42-204.
